Illinois, session 104th, HB3224.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Line of Duty Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2, 3, and 4 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 315/2)  (from Ch. 48, par. 282)7    Sec. 2. As used in this Act, unless the context otherwise 8requires: 9    (a) "Law enforcement officer" or "officer" means any 10person employed by the State or a local governmental entity as 11a policeman, peace officer, auxiliary policeman or in some 12like position involving the enforcement of the law and 13protection of the public interest at the risk of that person's 14life. This includes supervisors, wardens, superintendents and 15their assistants, guards and keepers, correctional officers, 16youth supervisors, parole agents, aftercare specialists, 17school teachers, and correctional counselors in all facilities 18of both the Department of Corrections and the Department of 19Juvenile Justice, while within the facilities under the 20control of the Department of Corrections or the Department of 21Juvenile Justice or in the act of transporting inmates or 22wards from one location to another or while performing their 23official duties, and all other Department of Corrections or   HB3224- 2 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1Department of Juvenile Justice employees who have daily 2contact with inmates. For the purposes of this Act, "law 3enforcement officer" or "officer" also means a probation 4officer, as defined in Section 9b of the Probation and 5Probation Officers Act. 6    The death of the foregoing employees of the Department of 7Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice in order to 8be included herein must be by the direct or indirect willful 9act of an inmate, ward, work-releasee, parolee, aftercare 10releasee, parole violator, aftercare release violator, person 11under conditional release, or any person sentenced or 12committed, or otherwise subject to confinement in or to the 13Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 14Justice.15    (b) "Fireman" means any person employed by the State or a 16local governmental entity as, or otherwise serving as, a 17member or officer of a fire department either for the purpose 18of the prevention or control of fire or the underwater 19recovery of drowning victims, including volunteer firemen.20    (c) "Local governmental entity" includes counties, 21municipalities, and municipal corporations.22    (d) "State" means the State of Illinois and its 23departments, divisions, boards, bureaus, commissions, 24authorities, and colleges and universities.25    (e) "Killed in the line of duty" means losing one's life as 26a result of injury received in the active performance of   HB3224- 3 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1duties as a law enforcement officer, civil defense worker, 2civil air patrol member, paramedic, fireman, or chaplain, or 3emergency medical services personnel if the death occurs 4within one year from the date the injury was received and if 5that injury arose from violence or other accidental cause. In 6the case of a State employee, "killed in the line of duty" 7means losing one's life as a result of injury received in the 8active performance of one's duties as a State employee, if the 9death occurs within one year from the date the injury was 10received and if that injury arose from a willful act of 11violence by another State employee committed during such other 12employee's course of employment and after January 1, 1988. The 13term excludes death resulting from the willful misconduct or 14intoxication of the officer, civil defense worker, civil air 15patrol member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, emergency medical 16services personnel, or State employee. However, the burden of 17proof of such willful misconduct or intoxication of the 18officer, civil defense worker, civil air patrol member, 19paramedic, fireman, chaplain, emergency medical services 20personnel, or State employee is on the Attorney General. 21Subject to the conditions set forth in subsection (a) with 22respect to inclusion under this Act of Department of 23Corrections and Department of Juvenile Justice employees 24described in that subsection, for the purposes of this Act, 25instances in which a law enforcement officer receives an 26injury in the active performance of duties as a law   HB3224- 4 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1enforcement officer include, but are not limited to, instances 2when:3        (1) the injury is received as a result of a willful act 4    of violence committed other than by the officer and a 5    relationship exists between the commission of such act and 6    the officer's performance of his duties as a law 7    enforcement officer, whether or not the injury is received 8    while the officer is on duty as a law enforcement officer;9        (2) the injury is received by the officer while the 10    officer is attempting to prevent the commission of a 11    criminal act by another or attempting to apprehend an 12    individual the officer suspects has committed a crime, 13    whether or not the injury is received while the officer is 14    on duty as a law enforcement officer;15        (3) the injury is received by the officer while the 16    officer is traveling to or from his employment as a law 17    enforcement officer or during any meal break, or other 18    break, which takes place during the period in which the 19    officer is on duty as a law enforcement officer.20    In the case of an Armed Forces member, "killed in the line 21of duty" means losing one's life while on active duty in 22connection with the September 11, 2001 terrorist attacks on 23the United States, Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation 24Freedom's Sentinel, Operation Iraqi Freedom, Operation New 25Dawn, or Operation Inherent Resolve.26    (f) "Volunteer fireman" means a person having principal   HB3224- 5 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1employment other than as a fireman, but who is carried on the 2rolls of a regularly constituted fire department either for 3the purpose of the prevention or control of fire or the 4underwater recovery of drowning victims, the members of which 5are under the jurisdiction of the corporate authorities of a 6city, village, incorporated town, or fire protection district, 7and includes a volunteer member of a fire department organized 8under the General Not for Profit Corporation Act, which is 9under contract with any city, village, incorporated town, fire 10protection district, or persons residing therein, for fire 11fighting services. "Volunteer fireman" does not mean an 12individual who volunteers assistance without being regularly 13enrolled as a fireman.14    (g) "Civil defense worker" means any person employed by 15the State or a local governmental entity as, or otherwise 16serving as, a member of a civil defense work force, including 17volunteer civil defense work forces engaged in serving the 18public interest during periods of disaster, whether natural or 19man-made.20    (h) "Civil air patrol member" means any person employed by 21the State or a local governmental entity as, or otherwise 22serving as, a member of the organization commonly known as the 23"Civil Air Patrol", including volunteer members of the 24organization commonly known as the "Civil Air Patrol".25    (i) "Paramedic" means an Emergency Medical 26Technician-Paramedic certified by the Illinois Department of   HB3224- 6 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1Public Health under the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 2Systems Act, and all other emergency medical personnel 3certified by the Illinois Department of Public Health who are 4members of an organized body or not-for-profit corporation 5under the jurisdiction of a city, village, incorporated town, 6fire protection district, or county, that provides emergency 7medical treatment to persons of a defined geographical area.8    (j) "State employee" means any employee as defined in 9Section 14-103.05 of the Illinois Pension Code.10    (k) "Chaplain" means an individual who:11        (1) is a chaplain of (i) a fire department or (ii) a 12    police department or other agency consisting of law 13    enforcement officers; and14        (2) has been designated a chaplain by (i) the fire 15    department, police department, or other agency or an 16    officer or body having jurisdiction over the department or 17    agency or (ii) a labor organization representing the 18    firemen or law enforcement officers.19    (l) "Armed Forces member" means an Illinois resident who 20is: a member of the Armed Forces of the United States; a member 21of the Illinois National Guard while on active military 22service pursuant to an order of the President of the United 23States; or a member of any reserve component of the Armed 24Forces of the United States while on active military service 25pursuant to an order of the President of the United States.26    (m) "Emergency Medical Services personnel" has the meaning   HB3224- 7 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1set forth in Section 3.5 of the Emergency Medical Services 2(EMS) Systems Act. 3(Source: P.A. 102-221, eff. 1-1-22; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 4    (820 ILCS 315/3)  (from Ch. 48, par. 283)5    Sec. 3. Duty death benefit. 6    (a) If a claim therefor is made within 2 years of the date 7of death of a law enforcement officer, civil defense worker, 8civil air patrol member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, 9emergency medical services personnel, or State employee killed 10in the line of duty, or if a claim therefor is made within 2 11years of the date of death of an Armed Forces member killed in 12the line of duty, compensation shall be paid to the person 13designated by the law enforcement officer, civil defense 14worker, civil air patrol member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, 15emergency medical services personnel, State employee, or Armed 16Forces member. However, if the Armed Forces member was killed 17in the line of duty before October 18, 2004, the claim must be 18made within one year of October 18, 2004. In addition, if a 19death occurred after December 31, 2016 and before January 1, 202021, the claim may be made no later than December 31, 2022 21notwithstanding any other deadline established under this Act 22with respect to filing a claim for a duty death benefit. 23    (b) The amount of compensation, except for an Armed Forces 24member, shall be $10,000 if the death in the line of duty 25occurred prior to January 1, 1974; $20,000 if such death   HB3224- 8 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1occurred after December 31, 1973 and before July 1, 1983; 2$50,000 if such death occurred on or after July 1, 1983 and 3before January 1, 1996; $100,000 if the death occurred on or 4after January 1, 1996 and before May 18, 2001; $118,000 if the 5death occurred on or after May 18, 2001 and before July 1, 62002; and $259,038 if the death occurred on or after July 1, 72002 and before January 1, 2003. For an Armed Forces member 8killed in the line of duty (i) at any time before January 1, 92005, the compensation is $259,038 plus amounts equal to the 10increases for 2003 and 2004 determined under subsection (c) 11and (ii) on or after January 1, 2005, the compensation is the 12amount determined under item (i) plus the applicable increases 13for 2005 and thereafter determined under subsection (c).14    (c) Except as provided in subsection (b), for deaths 15occurring on or after January 1, 2003, the death compensation 16rate for death in the line of duty occurring in a particular 17calendar year shall be the death compensation rate for death 18occurring in the previous calendar year (or in the case of 19deaths occurring in 2003, the rate in effect on December 31, 202002) increased by a percentage thereof equal to the 21percentage increase, if any, in the index known as the 22Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. city 23average, unadjusted, for all items, as published by the United 24States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for 25the 12 months ending with the month of June of that previous 26calendar year.  HB3224- 9 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1    (d) If no beneficiary is designated or if no designated 2beneficiary survives at the death of the law enforcement 3officer, civil defense worker, civil air patrol member, 4paramedic, fireman, chaplain, emergency medical services 5personnel, or State employee killed in the line of duty, the 6compensation shall be paid in accordance with a legally 7binding will left by the law enforcement officer, civil 8defense worker, civil air patrol member, paramedic, fireman, 9chaplain, emergency medical services personnel, or State 10employee. If the law enforcement officer, civil defense 11worker, civil air patrol member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, 12emergency medical services personnel, or State employee did 13not leave a legally binding will, the compensation shall be 14paid as follows: 15        (1) when there is a surviving spouse, the entire sum 16    shall be paid to the spouse; 17        (2) when there is no surviving spouse, but a surviving 18    descendant of the decedent, the entire sum shall be paid 19    to the decedent's descendants per stirpes; 20        (3) when there is neither a surviving spouse nor a 21    surviving descendant, the entire sum shall be paid to the 22    parents of the decedent in equal parts, allowing to the 23    surviving parent, if one is dead, the entire sum; and 24        (4) when there is no surviving spouse, descendant or 25    parent of the decedent, but there are surviving brothers 26    or sisters, or descendants of a brother or sister, who   HB3224- 10 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1    were receiving their principal support from the decedent 2    at his death, the entire sum shall be paid, in equal parts, 3    to the dependent brothers or sisters or dependent 4    descendant of a brother or sister. Dependency shall be 5    determined by the Court of Claims based upon the 6    investigation and report of the Attorney General.7The changes made to this subsection (d) by this amendatory Act 8of the 94th General Assembly apply to any pending case as long 9as compensation has not been paid to any party before the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General 11Assembly. 12    (d-1) For purposes of subsection (d), in the case of a 13person killed in the line of duty who was born out of wedlock 14and was not an adoptive child at the time of the person's 15death, a person shall be deemed to be a parent of the person 16killed in the line of duty only if that person would be an 17eligible parent, as defined in Section 2-2 of the Probate Act 18of 1975, of the person killed in the line of duty. This 19subsection (d-1) applies to any pending claim if compensation 20was not paid to the claimant of the pending claim before the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General 22Assembly. 23    (d-2) If no beneficiary is designated or if no designated 24beneficiary survives at the death of the Armed Forces member 25killed in the line of duty, the compensation shall be paid in 26entirety according to the designation made on the most recent   HB3224- 11 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1version of the Armed Forces member's Servicemembers' Group 2Life Insurance Election and Certificate ("SGLI").3    If no SGLI form exists at the time of the Armed Forces 4member's death, the compensation shall be paid in accordance 5with a legally binding will left by the Armed Forces member.6    If no SGLI form exists for the Armed Forces member and the 7Armed Forces member did not leave a legally binding will, the 8compensation shall be paid to the persons and in the priority 9as set forth in paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (d) of 10this Section.11    This subsection (d-2) applies to any pending case as long 12as compensation has not been paid to any party before the 13effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General 14Assembly. 15    (e) If there is no beneficiary designated or if no 16designated beneficiary survives at the death of the law 17enforcement officer, civil defense worker, civil air patrol 18member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, emergency medical 19services personnel, State employee, or Armed Forces member 20killed in the line of duty and there is no other person or 21entity to whom compensation is payable under this Section, no 22compensation shall be payable under this Act.23    (f) No part of such compensation may be paid to any other 24person for any efforts in securing such compensation.25    (g) This amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly 26applies to claims made on or after October 18, 2004 with   HB3224- 12 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1respect to an Armed Forces member killed in the line of duty. 2    (h) In any case for which benefits have not been paid 3within 6 months of the claim being filed in accordance with 4this Section, which is pending as of the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, and in which 6there are 2 or more beneficiaries, at least one of whom would 7receive at least a portion of the total benefit regardless of 8the manner in which the Court of Claims resolves the claim, the 9Court shall direct the Comptroller to pay the minimum amount 10of money which the determinate beneficiary would receive 11together with all interest payment penalties which have 12accrued on that portion of the award being paid within 30 days 13of the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th 14General Assembly. For purposes of this subsection (h), 15"determinate beneficiary" means the beneficiary who would 16receive any portion of the total benefit claimed regardless of 17the manner in which the Court of Claims adjudicates the claim.18    (i) The Court of Claims shall ensure that all individuals 19who have filed an application to claim the duty death benefit 20for a deceased member of the Armed Forces pursuant to this 21Section or for a fireman pursuant to this Section, or their 22designated representative, shall have access, on a timely 23basis and in an efficient manner, to all information related 24to the court's consideration, processing, or adjudication of 25the claim, including, but not limited to, the following:26        (1) a reliable estimate of when the Court of Claims   HB3224- 13 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1    will adjudicate the claim, or if the Court cannot estimate 2    when it will adjudicate the claim, a full written 3    explanation of the reasons for this inability; and4        (2) a reliable estimate, based upon consultation with 5    the Comptroller, of when the benefit will be paid to the 6    claimant.7    (j) The Court of Claims shall send written notice to all 8claimants within 2 weeks of the initiation of a claim 9indicating whether or not the application is complete. For 10purposes of this subsection (j), an application is complete if 11a claimant has submitted to the Court of Claims all documents 12and information the Court requires for adjudicating and paying 13the benefit amount. For purposes of this subsection (j), a 14claim for the duty death benefit is initiated when a claimant 15submits any of the application materials required for 16adjudicating the claim to the Court of Claims. In the event a 17claimant's application is incomplete, the Court shall include 18in its written notice a list of the information or documents 19which the claimant must submit in order for the application to 20be complete. In no case may the Court of Claims deny a claim 21and subsequently re-adjudicate the same claim for the purpose 22of evading or reducing the interest penalty payment amount 23payable to any claimant. 24(Source: P.A. 102-215, eff. 7-30-21; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 25    (820 ILCS 315/4)  (from Ch. 48, par. 284)  HB3224- 14 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1    Sec. 4. Notwithstanding Section 3, no compensation is 2payable under this Act unless a claim therefor is filed, 3within the time specified by that Section with the Court of 4Claims on an application prescribed and furnished by the 5Attorney General and setting forth:6        (a) the name, address and title or designation of the 7    position in which the officer, civil defense worker, civil 8    air patrol member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, emergency 9    medical services personnel, State employee, or Armed 10    Forces member was serving at the time of his death;11        (b) the names and addresses of person or persons 12    designated by the officer, civil defense worker, civil air 13    patrol member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, emergency 14    medical services personnel, State employee, or Armed 15    Forces member to receive the compensation and, if more 16    than one, the percentage or share to be paid to each such 17    person, or if there has been no such designation, the name 18    and address of the personal representative of the estate 19    of the officer, civil defense worker, civil air patrol 20    member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, emergency medical 21    services personnel, State employee, or Armed Forces 22    member;23        (c) a full, factual account of the circumstances 24    resulting in or the course of events causing the death of 25    the officer, civil defense worker, civil air patrol 26    member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, emergency medical   HB3224- 15 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1    services personnel, State employee, or Armed Forces 2    member; and3        (d) such other information as the Court of Claims 4    reasonably requires.5    When a claim is filed, the Attorney General shall make an 6investigation for substantiation of matters set forth in such 7an application. 8    For the 2 years immediately following the effective date 9of this amendatory act of the 96th General Assembly, the Court 10of Claims shall direct the Comptroller to pay a 11"Modified-Eligibility Line of Duty Benefit" to eligible late 12claimants who file a claim for the benefit. A claim for a 13Modified-Eligibility Line of Duty Benefit must include all the 14application materials and documents required for all other 15claims payable under this Act, except as otherwise provided in 16this Section 4. For purposes of this Section 4 only, an 17"eligible late claimant" is a person who would have been 18eligible, at any time after September 11, 2001, to apply for 19and receive payment of a claim pursuant to this Act in 20connection with the death of an Armed Forces member killed in 21the line of duty or a fireman killed in the line of duty, but 22did not receive the award payment because:23        (1) the claim was rejected only because the claim was 24    not filed within the time limitation set forth in 25    subsection (a) of Section 3 of this Act; or26        (2) having met all other preconditions for applying   HB3224- 16 -LRB104 08661 SPS 18715 b1    for and receiving the award payment, the claimant did not 2    file a claim because the claim would not have been filed 3    within the time limitation set forth in subsection (a) of 4    Section 3 of this Act. For purposes of this Section 4 only, 5    the "Modified-Eligibility Line of Duty Benefit" is an 6    amount of money payable to eligible late claimants equal 7    to the amount set forth in Section 3 of this Act payable to 8    claimants seeking payment of awards under Section 3 of 9    this Act for claims made thereunder in the year in which 10    the claim for the Modified-Eligibility Line of Duty 11    Benefit is made. Within 6 months of receiving a complete 12    claim for the Modified-Eligibility Line of Duty Benefit, 13    the Court of Claims must direct the Comptroller to pay the 14    benefit amount to the eligible late claimant. 15(Source: P.A. 96-539, eff. 1-1-10; 96-923, eff. 1-1-11.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.